Illinois, session 104th, HB3999.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Division 53-16 to Article 3 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/Div. 3-16 heading new)7Division 3-16. County Co-Responder Pilot Program 8    (55 ILCS 5/3-16005 new)9    Sec. 3-16005. Definitions. As used in this Division:10    "Sheriff's office" means the sheriff's office of a county.11    "Social worker" means a licensed clinical social worker or 12licensed social worker, as those terms are defined in the 13Clinical Social Work and Social Work Practice Act.14    "Station adjustment" has the meaning given to that term in 15Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.16    "Unit" means a co-responder unit created under this 17Division. 18    (55 ILCS 5/3-16010 new)19    Sec. 3-16010. Establishment; responsibilities; focus.20    (a) Each sheriff's office may establish a co-responder 21unit, subject to appropriation, including the hiring of   HB3999- 2 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1personnel as provided in this Division.2    (b) Along with the duties described in Sections 3-16015 3and 3-16020, the unit's social workers are responsible for 4conducting follow-up visits for victims who may benefit from 5mental or behavioral health services. The unit shall utilize 6community resources, including services provided through the 7Department of Human Services and social workers in juvenile 8and adult investigations, to connect individuals with 9appropriate services.10    (c) The unit's primary area of focus shall be victim 11assistance. 12    (55 ILCS 5/3-16015 new)13    Sec. 3-16015. Duties. The duties of the unit shall 14include, but shall not be limited to:15        (1) serving as a resource to a department's community 16    to identify and coordinate the social services available 17    to residents who are victims of criminal acts;18        (2) networking with area social service agencies to 19    develop a community-mutual resource system and wrap-around 20    services (a team-based, collaborative case management 21    approach) for victims in need of social service 22    assistance;23        (3) fostering relationships with community 24    organizations, including, but not limited to, area 25    hospitals, school districts, juvenile justice system, and   HB3999- 3 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1    various community groups;2        (4) employing social workers of the unit who shall: 3            (A) provide, upon request, community presentations 4        on an array of social service topics;5            (B) assist individuals in diversion from the 6        criminal justice system by addressing problems or 7        concerns through therapeutic intervention;8            (C) facilitate follow-up treatment or referral to 9        the appropriate community resource organization; 10            (D) assist department employees, upon request, in 11        securing services for those in need and provide 12        educational information to help the employees better 13        understand the circumstances or the community concern; 14            (E) meet with walk-ins requesting information or 15        assistance;16            (F) protect the interest, confidentiality, and 17        civil rights of the client;18            (G) train social work interns who may be working 19        within the unit;20            (H) be on-call after regular business hours, as 21        needed;22            (I) inform clients, prior to providing services 23        under this Division, about which communications are 24        confidential pursuant to applicable provisions of 25        State or federal law, rule, or regulation and which 26        communications may be shared with the social worker's   HB3999- 4 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1        employer;2            (J) consult on all cases as needed by the 3        sheriff's office;4            (K) perform other functions as provided in Section 5        3-16020 or as otherwise needed by the sheriff's 6        office; 7        (5) employing social workers who shall work with 8    victims of crimes as follows:9            (A) review police reports to identify known 10        victims and contact them to offer direct and referred 11        services;12            (B) assist victims with filing police reports and 13        victim compensation forms;14            (C) provide safety planning services to victims;15            (D) provide crisis counseling services to victims 16        and their families;17            (E) conduct home visits with victims in 18        conjunction with police backup, when needed;19            (F) assist victims in obtaining orders of 20        protection. A social worker, in the performance of his 21        or her duties under this subparagraph, is an advocate, 22        as that term is defined in Section 112A-3 of the Code 23        of Criminal Procedure of 1963;24            (G) facilitate court advocacy services for 25        victims, including arranging for transportation to and 26        from court;  HB3999- 5 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1            (H) maintain confidential case files that include 2        social history, diagnosis, formulation of treatment, 3        and documentation of services;4            (I) perform miscellaneous personal advocacy tasks 5        for victims, as needed;6            (J) oversee activities to ensure that those 7        victims with the most urgent needs are given the 8        highest priority for services; and9            (K) provide status updates on the progress of a 10        victim's case;11        (6) adhering to and understanding the applicable 12    policies, procedures, and orders of a department;13        (7) attaining department-established unit goals;14        (8) maintaining a positive relationship with 15    coworkers, as well as the investigators from area police 16    departments, and facilitating the exchange of information 17    and resources pertaining to investigations that would not 18    violate confidentiality as protected pursuant to 19    applicable provisions of State or federal law, rule, or 20    regulation;21        (9) keeping informed on crime trends within the 22    county;23        (10) remaining obedient and responsive to all lawful 24    verbal and written orders issued by superiors; and25        (11) completing police reports and other required 26    documentation; and  HB3999- 6 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1        (12) performing such other duties as may be required 2    by State law, city ordinance, and office policy or as may 3    be assigned by a sworn supervisor.  4    (55 ILCS 5/3-16020 new)5    Sec. 3-16020. Social workers.6    (a) Unit social workers may be referred to as victim 7service specialists. Social workers are responsible for 8working as a team to provide trauma-informed crisis 9intervention, case management, advocacy, and ongoing emotional 10support to the victims of all crimes, with extra attention to 11crimes that cause a high level of victim trauma.12    (b) Unit social workers involved in a case under adult 13investigations:14        (1) work with domestic violence investigators;15        (2) assist victims with finding safe housing, 16    transportation, and legal assistance;17        (3) provide other needed resources for victims and 18    their families, including working with children who 19    witness or experience domestic violence;20        (4) assist victims and their children in setting up 21    counseling; and22        (5) help reduce victims' chances of reentry into 23    violent situations.24    (c) Unit social workers involved in a case under juvenile 25investigations may:  HB3999- 7 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1        (1) work with families that have habitual runaways and 2    determine why the juveniles keep running away;3        (2) provide services to families where there have been 4    domestic disturbances between the juveniles and their 5    parents;6        (3) provide resources for parents to help their 7    children who are struggling in school or need 8    transportation to school;9        (4) provide guidance and advice to the families of a 10    juvenile who has been arrested and what the next steps and 11    options are in the process;12        (5) assist a juvenile with station adjustments and 13    creating a station adjustment program in the sheriff's 14    office;15        (6) provide services to juvenile victims and families 16    where the Department of Children and Family Services 17    either did not get involved or did not provide services;18        (7) assist with overcoming feuds between groups of 19    juveniles;20        (8) assist in instances where the families are not 21    cooperative with the sheriff's office;22        (9) discuss with families and juveniles options and 23    solutions to prevent future arrest;24        (10) maintain a list of families in need that the unit 25    or sheriff's office have had contact with for office or 26    county special events;  HB3999- 8 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1        (11) help facilitate or assist the sheriff's office in 2    community-oriented events, such as setting up an event 3    where officers or unit personnel read books with younger 4    children, talking about cyber crimes and social media, or 5    having an officer or unit personnel visit a school for 6    other activities; and7        (12) help reduce juvenile recidivism.  8    (55 ILCS 5/3-16025 new)9    Sec. 3-16025. Training. All unit employees shall receive 10crisis intervention training and integrating communications, 11assessment, and tactics training. Integrating communications, 12assessment, and tactics training shall be designed for 13situations involving persons who are unarmed or are armed with 14weapons and who may be experiencing a mental health or other 15crisis. The training described in this Section shall 16incorporate different skill sets into a unified training 17approach that emphasizes scenario-based exercises, as well as 18lecture and case study opportunities. 19    (55 ILCS 5/3-16030 new)20    Sec. 3-16030. Privileged or confidential communications. 21Nothing contained in this Division shall be construed to 22impair or limit the confidentiality of communications 23otherwise protected by law as privileged or confidential, 24including, but not limited to, information communicated in   HB3999- 9 -LRB104 12508 RTM 22908 b1confidence to a social worker or social work intern who works 2under the direct supervision of a social worker. A social 3worker may not be subjected to adverse employment action, the 4threat of adverse employment action, or any manner of 5discrimination because the employee is acting or has acted to 6protect communications as privileged or confidential pursuant 7to applicable provisions of State or federal law, rule, or 8regulation. 9    (55 ILCS 5/3-16099 new)10    Sec. 3-16099. Repeal. This Division is repealed January 1, 112029.